Rhode Island, session 2025, SB556.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-27.1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-27.1 entitled
"Aggressive Driving" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-27.1-3. “Aggressive driving” defined.
“Aggressive driving” means that an individual, coincident to operating a motor vehicle in
violation of chapter 14 of this title, engages in conduct which violates two (2) or more of the
following sections of law:
(1) Obedience to traffic control devices, § 31-13-4;
(2) Overtaking on the right, § 31-15-5;
(3) Driving within a traffic lane, § 31-15-1;
(4) Following too closely — interval between vehicles, § 31-15-12;
(5) Yielding right of way, §§ 31-15-12.1, 31-17-1, 31-17-2, 31-17-4, 31-17-6, 31-17-7 and
31-17-8;
(6) Entering the roadway, §§ 31-15-14, 31-17-3 and 31-17-5;
(7) Use of turn signals, §§ 31-16-5, 31-16-6, 31-16-8 and 31-16-9;
(8) Relating to school buses, special stops, stop signs and yield signs, chapter 20 of this
title; and
(9) Use of emergency break-down lane for travel, § 31-15-16;
(10) Obedience to police officers, § 31-12-3;
(11) Overtaking on left, § 31-15-4;

(12) Clearance for overtaking, § 31-15-6;
(13) Places where over taking is prohibited, § 31-15-7; or
(14) Laned roadways, § 31-15-11.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001664
========
LC001664 - Page 2 of 3